Maryland, session 2025, SB0977.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Business Regulation
1–211.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “COVERED RECORD” MEANS A COPY OF ANY DATA, INFORMATION,
OR RECORD THAT:
(I) WAS MADE BY A UNIT OR INSTRUMENTALITY OF STATE OR
LOCAL GOVERNMENT; AND
(II) CONTAINS PERSONAL INFORMATION.
(3) “PERSONAL INFORMATION” MEANS ANY INFORMATION THAT IS
LINKED OR CAN BE REASONABLY LINKED TO AN IDENTIFIED OR IDENTIFIABLE
INDIVIDUAL WHO RESIDES IN THE STATE.
(B) THIS SECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO THE INDIVIDUAL TO WHOM THE
PERSONAL INFORMATION IS LINKED OR CAN BE REASONABLY LINKED.
(C) A PERSON IN POSSESSION OF A COVERED RECORD MAY NOT SHARE OR
OTHERWISE MAKE AVAILABLE THE COVERED RECORD IN EXCHANGE FOR ANYTHING
OF VALUE OR FOR THE PURPOSE OF RESALE.
(D) A PERSON WHO OBTAINS A COVERED RECORD IN EXCHANGE FOR
ANYTHING OF VALUE MAY NOT SHARE OR OTHERWISE MAKE AVAILABLE THE
COVERED RECORD FOR THE PURPOSE OF IMMIGRATION ENFORCEMENT, UNLESS:
(1) THE PERSON IS PRESENTED WITH A VALID WARRANT ISSUED BY A
FEDERAL COURT OR A COURT OF THE STATE; OR

SENATE BILL 977 3
(2) THE COVERED RECORD IS OTHERWISE MADE AVAILABLE FOR
INSPECTION TO ALL MEMBERS OF THE GENERAL PUBLIC BY THE UNIT OR
INSTRUMENTALITY OF STATE OR LOCAL GOVERNMENT WHICH MADE THE COVERED
RECORD.
Article – General Provisions
4–320.
(g) (2) A person receiving personal information under subsection (d), (e), or (f)
of this section may not disclose the personal information to a federal agent or federal agency
ANOTHER PERSON OR A GOVERNMENTAL ENTITY for the purpose of federal immigration
enforcement unless the person DISCLOSING THE PERSONAL INFORMATION is presented
with a valid warrant issued by a federal court or a court of this State.
4–320.1.
(a) In this section, “facial recognition” means a biometric software application
that identifies or verifies a person by comparing and analyzing patterns based on a person’s
facial contours.
(b) (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of this title, an officer, an
employee, an agent, or a contractor of the State or a political subdivision shall deny
inspection of the part of a public record that contains personal information or inspection of
a photograph of an individual by any federal agency PERSON OR GOVERNMENTAL
ENTITY seeking access for the purpose of enforcing federal immigration law, unless the
officer, employee, agent, or contractor is provided with a valid warrant issued by a federal
court or a court of this State.
(2) Notwithstanding any other provision of this title, an officer, an
employee, an agent, or a contractor of the State or a political subdivision shall deny
inspection using a facial recognition search of a digital photographic image or actual stored
data of a digital photographic image by any federal agency PERSON OR GOVERNMENTAL
ENTITY seeking access for the purpose of enforcing federal immigration law, unless the
officer, employee, agent, or contractor is provided with a valid warrant issued by a federal
court or a court of this State.
(3) On or before June 1, 2023, and each June 1 thereafter, the Motor
Vehicle Administration, the Department of State Police, and the Department of Public
Safety and Correctional Services shall, with respect to requests from federal agencies
seeking access for the purpose of federal immigration enforcement for personal information,
a photograph of an individual, or a facial recognition search, whether or not the request
was initiated through a State or local law enforcement agency, report to the General
Assembly, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, the following
information for the immediately preceding calendar year:

SENATE BILL 977
(i) the number of requests received from any federal agency for
personal information, a photograph of an individual, or a facial recognition search;
(ii) the number of requests received from any federal agency for
personal information, a photograph of an individual, or a facial recognition search for which
a valid warrant issued by a federal court or a court of this State was provided;
(iii) the number and purpose of facial recognition searches completed
for any federal agency based on personal information or a photograph of an individual
provided to the federal agency by the Motor Vehicle Administration, the Department of
State Police, or the Department of Public Safety and Correctional Services; and
(iv) the number of individuals whose personal information or
photograph was provided to any federal agency by, respectively, the Motor Vehicle
Administration, the Department of State Police, and the Department of Public Safety and
Correctional Services.
Article – Public Safety
3–529.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) (i) “Database” means any database operated by:
1. State and local law enforcement agencies, including
databases maintained for a law enforcement agency by a private vendor; OR
2. A UNIT OF STATE OR LOCAL GOVERNMENT,
INCLUDING DATABASES MAINTAINED FOR A UNIT OF STATE GOVERNMENT BY A
PRIVATE VENDOR.
(ii) “Database” does not include a registry operated under Title 11,
Subtitle 7 of the Criminal Procedure Article.
(3) (i) “Law enforcement agency” means a federal, state, or local agency
authorized to enforce criminal laws.
(ii) “Law enforcement agency” includes the Maryland Department of
Public Safety and Correctional Services.
(4) “SENSITIVE INFORMATION” INCLUDES PERSONAL INFORMATION
ON INDIVIDUALS WHO ARE SERVED OR ENGAGED BY A GRANTEE, CONTRACTOR, OR
CONSULTANT OF A UNIT OF STATE OR LOCAL GOVERNMENT.

SENATE BILL 977 5
(b) [An entity] A LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY OR A UNIT OF STATE OR
LOCAL GOVERNMENT operating a database shall:
(1) deny access to the database to any individual who is OR APPEARS TO
BE seeking access for the purpose of enforcing federal immigration law, unless the
individual presents a valid warrant issued by a federal court or a court of this State AND
CLEARLY IDENTIFIES THE RECORD TO BE ACCESSED; and
(2) require an individual accessing the database to provide to the [entity]
LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY OR THE UNIT OF STATE OR LOCAL GOVERNMENT:
(i) the individual’s name;
(ii) the individual’s contact information, including a telephone
number, an e–mail address, and a physical address; and
(iii) unless the individual presents a valid warrant issued by a federal
court or a court of this State AND CLEARLY IDENTIFIES THE RECORD TO BE ACCESSED,
a statement by the individual, under penalty of perjury, that the individual is not accessing
the database for the purpose of enforcing federal immigration law.
(C) A LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY OR A UNIT OF STATE OR LOCAL
GOVERNMENT OPERATING A BUILDING OR FACILITY SHALL:
(1) DENY ACCESS TO THE BUILDING OR FACILITY TO ANY INDIVIDUAL
WHO IS OR APPEARS TO BE SEEKING ACCESS FOR THE PURPOSE OF ENFORCING
FEDERAL IMMIGRATION LAW, UNLESS THE INDIVIDUAL PRESENTS A VALID
WARRANT ISSUED BY A FEDERAL COURT OR A COURT OF THIS STATE AND CLEARLY
IDENTIFIES THE BUILDING OR FACILITY, OR RECORD OR INFORMATION WITHIN THE
BUILDING OR FACILITY, TO BE ACCESSED; AND
(2) REQUIRE AN INDIVIDUAL ACCESSING THE BUILDING OR FACILITY
TO PROVIDE TO THE LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY OR THE UNIT OF STATE OR LOCAL
GOVERNMENT:
(I) THE INDIVIDUAL’S NAME;
(II) THE INDIVIDUAL’S CONTACT INFORMATION, INCLUDING A
TELEPHONE NUMBER, AN E–MAIL ADDRESS, AND A PHYSICAL ADDRESS; AND
(III) UNLESS THE INDIVIDUAL PRESENTS A VALID WARRANT
ISSUED BY A FEDERAL COURT OR A COURT OF THIS STATE AND CLEARLY IDENTIFIES
THE BUILDING OR FACILITY, OR RECORD OR INFORMATION WITHIN THE BUILDING
OR FACILITY, TO BE ACCESSED, A STATEMENT BY THE INDIVIDUAL, UNDER PENALTY
OF PERJURY, THAT THE INDIVIDUAL IS NOT ACCESSING THE BUILDING, FACILITY,

SENATE BILL 977
RECORD, OR INFORMATION FOR THE PURPOSE OF ENFORCING FEDERAL
IMMIGRATION LAW.
(D) A LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY OR A UNIT OF STATE OR LOCAL
GOVERNMENT MAY NOT ENTER INTO A MEMORANDUM OF UNDERSTANDING OR
SIMILAR AGREEMENT THAT REQUIRES COLLABORATION OR INFORMATION SHARING
WITH A FEDERAL AGENCY FOR THE PURPOSE OF ENFORCING FEDERAL
IMMIGRATION LAW.
(E) (C) EACH UNIT OF STATE GOVERNMENT SHALL:
(1) MAINTAIN A RECORD OF EACH REQUEST BY AN INDIVIDUAL
SEEKING ACCESS TO A DATABASE, FACILITY, BUILDING, RECORD, OR INFORMATION
AS DESCRIBED UNDER THIS SECTION; AND
(2) ON OR BEFORE DECEMBER 1, 2025, AND EACH YEAR
THEREAFTER, SUBMIT A REPORT TO THE ATTORNEY GENERAL AND, IN
ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, THE GENERAL
ASSEMBLY ON:
(I) THE NUMBER AND NATURE OF ACCESS REQUESTS
RECEIVED;
(II) WHETHER THE REQUESTS WERE GRANTED OR DENIED; AND
(III) ANY OTHER INFORMATION REQUIRED TO ENSURE
COMPLIANCE WITH THIS SECTION.
(F) THE ATTORNEY GENERAL SHALL:
(1) ENFORCE THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SECTION THROUGH ANY
MEANS NORMALLY AVAILABLE IN THE ENFORCEMENT OF CIVIL VIOLATIONS; AND
(2) ESTABLISH A SYSTEM OF CIVIL PENALTIES NOT EXCEEDING
$1,000 PER VIOLATION OF THIS SECTION.
(G) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY OTHER PROVISION OF LAW, A STATE
EMPLOYEE WHO VIOLATES THIS SECTION IS SUBJECT TO DISCIPLINE, INCLUDING
TERMINATION FROM EMPLOYMENT.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.